Utah statutes.
58-60-511.   Experience requirement -- Transition of licensing and experience.

(1)  Except as otherwise approved in writing by the board and the division, hours of experience required by Section 58-60-506 that are earned after January 1, 2008, shall be earned while the person earning the hours is licensed under this part.

(2)  An applicant working toward licensure under rules in effect before July 1, 2007 who has 200 or more hours of addiction-specific training conducted at an approved agency before July 1, 2007 may apply in writing to extend the time to complete the remainder of the training requirement until July 1, 2008.

(3) (a)  The division may grant an applicant credit for up to 3,000 hours of experience required under this part for hours completed before January 1, 2008.

(b)  The division shall grant a request for credit under Subsection (3)(a) if the experience completed before January 1, 2008 is reasonably equivalent to the experience required by this part.

